cs: Účel přísady do chladicí kapaliny: Odvápňovač / ochrana proti vodnímu kameni (kontrola usazenin minerálů); Ochrana proti varu / zvýšení bodu varu; Ochrana proti kavitaci (mokré vložky válců); Kondicionér / doplněk chladicího systému; Inhibitor koroze; Ochrana proti elektrolýze; Zvýšení ochrany proti zamrznutí; Přenos tepla / snížení teploty; Barvivo pro detekci úniků (UV barvivo); Čistič chladiče / chladicího systému (jemný); Inhibitor rzi; Mazivo vodní pumpy; pH pufr / neutralizátor kyselin; Jiné
ro-RO: Scopul aditivului pentru lichidul de răcire: Anti-calcar/decalcifiant (controlul depunerilor minerale); Protecție la supraîncălzire/Creșterea punctului de fierbere; Protecție la cavitație (cămăși umede de cilindru); Tratament/supliment pentru sistemul de răcire; Inhibitor de coroziune; Protecție împotriva electrolizei; Amplificator de protecție la îngheț; Transfer termic/Reductor de temperatură; Substanță de contrast pentru detectarea scurgerilor (UV); Soluție de curățare radiator/sistem de răcire (uz ușor); Inhibitor de rugină; Lubrifiant pentru pompa de apă; Tampon pH/neutralizator de acizi; Altele
hr-HR: Namjena aditiva za rashladnu tekućinu: Sredstvo protiv kamenca / za uklanjanje kamenca (kontrola mineralnih naslaga); Zaštita od vrenja / pojačivač točke vrelišta; Zaštita od kavitacije (mokra cilindarska košuljica); Regenerator/dodatak za rashladni sustav; Inhibitor korozije; Zaštita od elektrolize; Pojačivač zaštite od smrzavanja; Prijenos topline / smanjenje temperature; Boja za detekciju curenja (UV boja); Čistač hladnjaka / rashladnog sustava (blagi); Inhibitor hrđe; Mazivo za vodenu pumpu; pH pufer / neutralizator kiseline; Ostalo
ko: 냉각수 첨가제 용도: 물때 방지/제거(미네랄 침전물 제어); 오버히트 방지/비등점 향상; 캐비테이션 방지(습식 슬리브 라이너); 냉각 시스템 컨디셔너/보충제; 부식 억제제; 전해 부식 방지; 동결 방지 향상; 열 전달/온도 저하; 누출 탐지 염료(UV 염료); 라디에이터/냉각 시스템 클리너(일반용); 방청제; 워터 펌프 윤활제; pH 완충제/산 중화제; 기타
pt-BR: Finalidade do aditivo para líquido de arrefecimento: Anti-incrustante/desincrustante (controle de depósito mineral); Proteção contra transbordamento/aumentador do ponto de ebulição; Proteção contra cavitação (camisa úmida); Condicionador/suplemento do sistema de arrefecimento; Inibidor de corrosão; Proteção contra eletrólise; Aumentador de proteção contra congelamento; Transferência de calor/redutor de temperatura; Corante de detecção de vazamento (corante UV); Limpador de radiador/sistema de arrefecimento (uso leve); Inibidor de ferrugem; Lubrificante da bomba de água; Tampão de pH/neutralizador de ácido; Outro
ru: Назначение присадки к охлаждающей жидкости: Средство от накипи (контроль минеральных отложений); Защита от закипания / повышение температуры кипения; Защита от кавитации (мокрая гильза цилиндра); Кондиционер / добавка для системы охлаждения; Ингибитор коррозии; Защита от электролиза; Средство для снижения температуры замерзания; Улучшение теплоотдачи / снижение температуры; Краситель для поиска утечек (УФ-краситель); Очиститель радиатора / системы охлаждения (мягкого действия); Ингибитор ржавчины; Смазка водяного насоса; pH-буфер / нейтрализатор кислоты; Другое
pt-PT: Finalidade do aditivo para líquido de refrigeração: Anticalcário/descalcificador (controlo de depósitos minerais); Proteção contra transbordo por fervura/aumentador do ponto de ebulição; Proteção contra cavitação (camisa de cilindro húmida); Condicionador/suplemento do sistema de arrefecimento; Inibidor de corrosão; Proteção contra eletrólise; Aumentador de proteção anticongelante; Transferência de calor/redutor de temperatura; Corante de deteção de fugas (corante UV); Produto de limpeza para radiadores/sistemas de arrefecimento (uso ligeiro); Inibidor de ferrugem; Lubrificante da bomba de água; Tampão de pH/neutralizador de ácidos; Outro
vi: Mục đích của chất phụ gia làm mát: Chống đóng cặn/tẩy cặn (kiểm soát cặn khoáng); Bảo vệ chống trào khi sôi/tăng điểm sôi; Bảo vệ chống tạo lỗ hổng (lót xi lanh ướt); Điều hòa/bổ sung hệ thống làm mát; Chất ức chế ăn mòn; Bảo vệ chống điện phân; Tăng cường bảo vệ chống đóng băng; Truyền nhiệt/giảm nhiệt độ; Thuốc nhuộm phát hiện rò rỉ (thuốc nhuộm UV); Chất tẩy rửa bộ tản nhiệt/hệ thống làm mát (công suất nhẹ); Chất ức chế gỉ sét; Chất bôi trơn máy bơm nước; Chất đệm pH/trung hòa axit; Khác
sk-SK: Účel prísady do chladiacej kvapaliny: Prostriedok proti vodnému kameňu / odvápňovač; Ochrana pred vyvretím / zvýšenie bodu varu; Ochrana proti kavitácii (mokré vložky valcov); Kondicionér/prísada do chladiaceho systému; Inhibítor korózie; Ochrana proti elektrolýze; Zvýšenie ochrany proti zamrznutiu; Prenos tepla / zníženie teploty; Farbivo na detekciu únikov (UV farbivo); Čistič chladiča a chladiaceho systému (bežné znečistenie); Inhibítor hrdze; Mazivo pre vodné čerpadlo; pH pufrovací roztok / neutralizátor kyselín; Iné
ja: クーラント添加剤使用目的: スケール防止 / スケール除去 (ミネラル沈着防止); オーバーヒート防止 / 沸点向上; キャビテーション防止 (ウェットスリーブライナー); 冷却システムコンディショナー / 補充液; 腐食防止剤; 電食防止; 凍結防止強化; 熱伝達向上 / 温度低減; 漏れ検知用染料 (UV染料); ラジエーター / 冷却システムクリーナー (軽度用); 防錆剤; ウォーターポンプ潤滑剤; pH緩衝剤 / 酸中和剤; その他
da: Formålet med kølemiddeadditivet: Afkalkningsmiddel/kedelstensfjerner (kontrol af mineralaflejringer); Beskyttelse mod overkogning/kogepunktsforstærker; Beskyttelse mod kavitation (våde foringer); Balsam/supplement til kølesystem; Korrosionshæmmer; Beskyttelse mod elektrolyse; Frostsikringsforstærker; Varmeoverførsel/temperaturreducer; Lækagesporingsfarve (UV-farve); Rens til køler/kølesystem (let); Rusthæmmer; Smøremiddel til vandpumpe; pH-buffer/syreneutralisator; Andet
it: Scopo dell'additivo per liquido di raffreddamento: Anticalcare/decalcificante (controllo dei depositi minerali); Protezione ebollizione/innalzatore del punto di ebollizione; Protezione contro la cavitazione (camicia umida); Balsamo/additivo per sistema di raffreddamento; Inibitore di corrosione; Protezione elettrolitica; Innalzatore della protezione antigelo; Trasferimento di calore/riduttore di temperatura; Colorante per il rilevamento delle perdite (colorante UV); Detergente per radiatore/sistema di raffreddamento (uso leggero); Inibitore di ruggine; Lubrificante per pompa dell’acqua; Tampone pH/neutralizzatore di acidi; Altro
nb: Formål med kjølevæsketilsetning: Antikalk/avkalker (kontroll av mineralavleiringer); Kokebeskyttelse/kokepunktforhøyer; Kavitasjonsbeskyttelse (våt foring); Kjølesystembalsam/-tilsetning; Korrosjonsbeskyttelse; Elektrolysebeskyttelse; Frostvæskeforsterker; Varmeoverføring/temperaturreduserer; Lekkasjesporingsfarge (UV-farge); Radiator-/kjølesystemrens (lett bruk); Rusthemmer; Smøremiddel for vannpumpe; pH-buffer/syrenøytraliserer; Annet
sv: Syfte med kylvätsketillsatsen: Avkalkningsmedel (motverkar mineralavlagringar); Kokningsskydd/höjer kokpunkten; Kavitationsskydd (våta cylinderfoder); Kylsystemstillsats; Korrosionshämmare; Elektrolysskydd; Frostskyddsförstärkare; Värmeöverföring/temperaturreducerare; Spårfärg för läckage (UV-färg); Rengöring för kylare/kylsystem (mild); Rostskydd; Vattenpumpssmörjmedel; pH-buffert/syraneutraliserare; Annat
el: Σκοπός πρόσθετου ψυκτικού μέσου: Κατά των αλάτων/αφαλατικό (έλεγχος επικαθίσεων αλάτων); Προστασία από βρασμό/ενισχυτικό σημείου βρασμού; Προστασία από σπηλαίωση (υγρό χιτώνιο); Βελτιωτικό/συμπλήρωμα συστήματος ψύξης; Αναστολέας διάβρωσης; Προστασία από ηλεκτρόλυση; Ενισχυτικό αντιψυκτικής προστασίας; Μεταφορά θερμότητας/μειωτής θερμοκρασίας; Χρωστική ανίχνευσης διαρροών (χρωστική UV); Καθαριστικό ψυγείου/συστήματος ψύξης (ελαφριάς χρήσης); Αναστολέας σκουριάς; Λιπαντικό αντλίας νερού; Ρυθμιστικό pH/εξουδετερωτής οξέων; Άλλο
en: Coolant additive purpose: Anti-scale/descaler (mineral deposit control); Boil-over protection/boiling point booster; Cavitation protection (wet sleeve liner); Cooling system conditioner/supplement; Corrosion inhibitor; Electrolysis protection; Freeze protection booster; Heat transfer/temperature reducer; Leak detection dye (UV dye); Radiator/cooling system cleaner (light duty); Rust inhibitor; Water pump lubricant; pH buffer/acid neutralizer; Other
es: Finalidad del aditivo refrigerante: Antisarro/descalcificador (control de depósitos minerales); Protección contra desbordamiento/refuerzo del punto de ebullición; Protección contra cavitación (camisa de cilindro húmeda); Acondicionador/suplemento del sistema de enfriamiento; Inhibidor de corrosión; Protección contra electrólisis; Refuerzo de protección contra congelamiento; Transferencia de calor/reductor de temperatura; Tinte para detección de fugas (tinte UV); Limpiador de radiador/sistema de enfriamiento (uso ligero); Inhibidor de óxido; Lubricante para bomba de agua; Amortiguador de pH/neutralizador de ácido; Otro
fr: Usage de l’additif de liquide de refroidissement: Anti-tartre/détartrant (contrôle des dépôts minéraux); Protection contre l'ébullition/augmentation du point d'ébullition; Protection contre la cavitation (chemise humide); Conditionneur/supplément pour système de refroidissement; Inhibiteur de corrosion; Protection contre l'électrolyse; Améliorateur de protection contre le gel; Transfert de chaleur/réducteur de température; Traceur de détection de fuite (colorant UV); Nettoyant pour radiateur/système de refroidissement (usage léger); Inhibiteur de rouille; Lubrifiant pour pompe à eau; Tampon pH/neutraliseur d'acide; Autre
zh-TW: 冷卻液添加劑用途: 防垢/除垢劑 (礦物質沉積控制); 防沸/沸點提升劑; 防氣穴劑 (濕式缸套); 冷卻系統調節劑/添加劑; 腐蝕抑制劑; 防電解劑; 防凍提升劑; 導熱/降溫劑; 測漏染劑 (UV 染劑); 水箱/冷卻系統清潔劑 (輕效型); 防鏽劑; 水泵潤滑劑; pH 緩衝劑/酸中和劑; 其他
nl: Doel koelvloeistofadditief: Anti-kalk/ontkalker (tegen minerale afzetting); Bescherming tegen overkoken/kookpuntverhoger; Bescherming tegen cavitatie (natte cilinderbus); Conditioner/supplement voor koelsysteem; Corrosieremmer; Bescherming tegen elektrolyse; Antivriesversterker; Warmteoverdracht/temperatuurverlager; Lekdetectiekleurstof (uv-kleurstof); Reiniger voor radiator/koelsysteem (licht gebruik); Roestremmer; Smeermiddel voor waterpomp; pH-buffer/zuurneutralisator; Overig
tr: Soğutma sıvısı katkı maddesinin amacı: Kireç önleyici/kireç çözücü (mineral tortu kontrolü); Aşırı kaynama koruması/kaynama noktası artırıcı; Kavitasyon koruması (ıslak gömlek); Soğutma sistemi düzenleyici/takviyesi; Korozyon önleyici; Elektroliz koruması; Donma koruması artırıcı; Isı transferi/sıcaklık düşürücü; Sızıntı tespit boyası (UV boya); Radyatör/soğutma sistemi temizleyici (hafif hizmet); Pas önleyici; Su pompası yağlayıcı; pH tamponlayıcı/asit nötrleştirici; Diğer
lt-LT: Aušinimo skysčio priedo paskirtis: Nukalkintojas / kalkių šalinimo priemonė (mineralinių nuosėdų kontrolė); Apsauga nuo užvirimo / virimo temperatūros didintojas; Apsauga nuo kavitacijos (šlapių cilindrų gilzių); Aušinimo sistemos kondicionierius / priedas; Korozijos inhibitorius; Apsauga nuo elektrolizės; Apsaugos nuo užšalimo didintojas; Šilumos perdavimo / temperatūros mažinimo priemonė; Nuotėkio aptikimo dažai (UV dažai); Radiatorių / aušinimo sistemos valiklis (silpno poveikio); Rūdžių inhibitorius; Vandens siurblio tepalas; pH buferis / rūgščių neutralizatorius; Kita
fi: Jäähdytysnesteen lisäaineen tarkoitus: Kalkinpoistoaine (mineraalikertymien hallinta); Ylikiehumissuoja/kiehumispisteen nostaja; Kavitaatiosuoja (märkä sylinteriputki); Jäähdytysjärjestelmän hoitoaine/lisäaine; Korroosionestoaine; Elektrolyysisuoja; Jäätymissuojan tehostaja; Lämmönsiirto/lämpötilan alentaja; Vuodonetsintäväri (UV-väri); Jäähdyttimen / jäähdytysjärjestelmän puhdistusaine (kevytkäyttö); Ruosteenestoaine; Vesipumpun voiteluaine; pH-puskuri / hapon neutraloija; Muu
hu: Hűtőfolyadék-adalékanyag célja: Vízkőgátló/vízkőoldó (ásványi lerakódás elleni védelem); Túlforrás elleni védelem / forráspont-növelő; Kavitáció elleni védelem (nedves hengerhüvely); Hűtőrendszer-kondicionáló/-adalék; Korróziógátló; Elektrolízis elleni védelem; Fagyáspontcsökkentő; Hőátadó / hőmérséklet-csökkentő; Szivárgásjelző festék (UV-festék); Hűtőradiátor/hűtőrendszer-tisztító (enyhe igénybevételre); Rozsdagátló; Vízpumpa-kenőanyag; pH-puffer / savsemlegesítő; Egyéb
de: Zweck des Kühlmittelzusatzes: Kalkschutz/Entkalker (Schutz vor Mineralablagerungen); Überhitzungsschutz/Siedepunkterhöher; Kavitationsschutz (nasse Zylinderlaufbuchse); Kühlsystem-Zusatz/Conditioner; Korrosionsinhibitor; Elektrolyseschutz; Frostschutzverstärker; Wärmeübertragung/Temperatursenker; Lecksuchfarbe (UV-Farbe); Kühler-/Kühlsystemreiniger (leichte Beanspruchung); Rostschutzmittel; Wasserpumpen-Schmiermittel; pH-Puffer/Säureneutralisator; Sonstige
pl: Przeznaczenie dodatku do płynu chłodzącego: Środek zapobiegający osadzaniu się kamienia / odkamieniacz (kontrola osadów mineralnych); Ochrona przed wygotowaniem / podniesienie temperatury wrzenia; Ochrona przed kawitacją (mokre tuleje cylindrowe); Ulepszacz/dodatek do układu chłodzenia; Inhibitor korozji; Ochrona przed elektrolizą; Zwiększenie ochrony przed zamarzaniem; Transfer ciepła / reduktor temperatury; Barwnik do wykrywania nieszczelności (barwnik UV); Środek do czyszczenia chłodnicy / układu chłodzenia (lekkie zabrudzenia); Inhibitor rdzy; Smar do pompy wody; Bufor pH / neutralizator kwasów; Inny
sl-SI: Namen dodatka za hladilno tekočino: Sredstvo proti vodnemu kamnu/za odstranjevanje vodnega kamna (nadzor mineralnih usedlin); Zaščita pred vrenjem/zvišanje vrelišča; Zaščita pred kavitacijo (mokre puše cilindrov); Sredstvo za nego/dodatek za hladilni sistem; Zaviralec korozije; Zaščita pred elektrolizo; Zvišanje zaščite pred zamrzovanjem; Prenos toplote/znižanje temperature; Barvilo za odkrivanje puščanja (UV-barvilo); Čistilo za hladilnik/hladilni sistem (za lažje čiščenje); Zaviralec rje; Mazivo za vodno črpalko; pH-pufer/nevtralizator kislin; Drugo
th: วัตถุประสงค์ของสารเติมแต่งน้ำหล่อเย็น: ป้องกันตะกรัน/ขจัดตะกรัน (ควบคุมการสะสมของแร่ธาตุ); ป้องกันน้ำเดือด/เพิ่มจุดเดือด; ป้องกันการเกิดฟองอากาศ (ปลอกสูบแบบเปียก); สารปรับสภาพ/สารเสริมระบบระบายความร้อน; สารยับยั้งการกัดกร่อน; ป้องกันอิเล็กโทรไลซิส; เพิ่มประสิทธิภาพการป้องกันการแข็งตัว; ถ่ายเทความร้อน/ลดอุณหภูมิ; สีย้อมตรวจจับรอยรั่ว (สีย้อม UV); น้ำยาล้างหม้อน้ำ/ระบบระบายความร้อน (สูตรอ่อนโยน); สารยับยั้งสนิม; น้ำมันหล่อลื่นปั๊มน้ำ; บัฟเฟอร์ pH/ปรับกรดให้เป็นกลาง; อื่นๆ
zh-CN: 冷却液添加剂用途: 防垢/除垢剂（控制矿物质沉积）; 防沸腾/沸点提升剂; 防气蚀（湿式缸套）; 冷却系统调节剂/补充剂; 缓蚀剂; 防电解; 防冻提升剂; 传热/降温剂; 检漏示踪剂（紫外线示踪剂）; 散热器/冷却系统清洁剂（轻度）; 防锈剂; 水泵润滑剂; pH 缓冲剂/酸中和剂; 其他
bg-BG: Предназначение на добавката за охладителна течност: Против котлен камък (контрол на минералните отлагания); Защита от кипене / повишаване на точката на кипене; Защита от кавитация (мокри ризи); Кондиционер/добавка за охладителна система; Инхибитор на корозия; Защита от електролиза; Повишаване на защитата от замръзване; Топлообмен / намаляване на температурата; Оцветител за откриване на течове (UV оцветител); Почистващ препарат за радиатор/охладителна система (леко замърсяване); Инхибитор на ръжда; Лубрикант за водна помпа; рН буфер / неутрализатор на киселини; Друго